Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1230.01
Employer; unpaid wages constituting commissions; duties.

Whenever an employer separates an employee from the payroll, the unpaid wages constituting commissions shall become due on the next regular payday following the employer's receipt of payment for the goods or services from the customer from which the commission was generated. The employer shall provide an employee with a periodic accounting of outstanding commissions until all commissions have been paid or the orders have been returned or canceled by the customer.

Laws 2007, LB255, § 4.